da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Strengeinstrumenter – tilbehør > Strenginstrumenter – pleje og rengøring > Strenginstrumenter – pudsemiddel: Gribebræt – pudsemiddel; Instrument – pudsemiddel; Lak
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za godala > Nega in čiščenje godal > Polirna sredstva za godala: Polirno sredstvo za ubiralke; Polirno sredstvo za instrumente; Lak
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de instrumentos de cordas > Limpeza e cuidado de instrumento de cordas > Polimento para instrumento de cordas: Polimento para escala; Polimento para instrumento; Verniz
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de cuerda > Limpieza y cuidado de instrumentos de cuerda > Cera para instrumentos de cuerda: Cera para diapasón; Cera para instrumentos; Barniz
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor snaarinstrumenten > Onderhoud en reiniging van snaarinstrumenten > Poetsmiddelen voor snaarinstrumenten: Poetsmiddelen voor toetsen; Poetsmiddelen voor instrumenten; Vernis
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Jousisoitintarvikkeet > Jousisoitinten puhdistus ja huolto > Jousisoitinten kiillotus: Sormilaudan kiillotusaineet; Instrumentin kiillotusaineet; Lakat
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 현악기 부대용품 > 현악기 관리/청소 용품 > 현악기 광택제: 지판 광택제; 악기 광택제; 니스
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องสาย > การดูแลและทำความสะอาดเครื่องสาย > ที่ขัดเงาเครื่องสาย: ที่ขัดเงาฟิงเกอร์บอร์ด; ที่ขัดเงาเครื่องดนตรี; น้ำยาวานิช
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Telli Çalgı Aksesuarları > Telli Çalgı Bakım ve Temizliği > Telli Çalgı Parlatıcıları: Klavye Parlatıcıları; Enstrüman Parlatıcıları; Vernik
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện dành cho nhạc cụ dây > Sản phẩm vệ sinh và chăm sóc nhạc cụ dây > Sơn nhạc cụ dây: Sơn đánh bóng cần đàn; Sơn đánh bóng nhạc cụ; Sơn bóng
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за струнни инструменти > Грижа и почистване на струнни инструменти > Препарати за полиране на струнни инструменти: Препарати за полиране на гриф; Препарати за полиране на корпус; Лак
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Styginių instrumentų priedai > Styginių instrumentų priežiūra ir valymas > Styginių instrumentų poliravimo priemonės: Pirštlentės poliravimo priemonės; Instrumentų poliravimo priemonės; Lakas
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > String Instrument Accessories > String Instrument Care & Cleaning > String Instrument Polish: Fingerboard Polish; Instrument Polish; Varnish
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za gudačka glazbala > Održavanje i čišćenje orkestralnih žičanih glazbala > Sredstvo za poliranje žičanih glazbala: Sredstvo za poliranje vrata glazbala; Sredstvo za poliranje glazbala; Lak
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de corda > Manutenção e limpeza de instrumentos de corda > Polimento para instrumentos de corda: Polimento para escala; Polimento para instrumentos; Verniz
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente cu coarde > Îngrijirea și curățarea instrumentelor cu coarde > Substanță pentru lustruit instrumente cu coarde: Substanță pentru lustruit griful; Substanță pentru lustruit instrumente; Lac
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów strunowych > Elementy konserwujące i czyszczące do instrumentów strunowych > Środki do polerowania instrumentów strunowych: Środek do polerowania gryfu; Środek do polerowania instrumentu; Lakier
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 弦乐器配件 > 弦乐器清洁保养 > 弦乐器抛光: 手指滑板抛光; 乐器抛光; 漆
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori strumenti a corda > Cura e pulitura strumenti a corda > Lucidatura strumenti a corda: Lucidatura per tastiera; Lucidatura per strumenti; Vernice
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Vonóshangszer-kiegészítők > Vonóshangszer-ápolás és -tisztítás > Vonóshangszer-fényezés: Fogólapfényezés; Hangszerfényezés; Lakk
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Saiteninstrumente > Saiteninstrumentenpflege &-reinigung > Politur für Saiteninstrumente: Fingerbrettpolitur; Instrumentenpolitur; Lack
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Smyčcové nástroje – příslušenství > Údržba a čištění strunných nástrojů > Leštidlo na strunné nástroje: Leštidlo na hmatníky; Leštidlo na nástroje; Lak
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till stränginstrument > Vård och rengöring av stränginstrument > Polermedel för stränginstrument: Gripbräda polsk; Instrument polska; Lack
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour instruments à cordes > Entretien et nettoyage des instruments à cordes > Cire d’entretien pour instruments à cordes: Cire d’entretien de la touche; Cire d’entretien d’instruments; Vernis
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 弦楽器用品 > 弦楽器お手入れ用品 > 弦楽器用ポリッシュ: 指板ポリッシュ; 弦楽器ポリッシュ; ワニス
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre sláčikové nástroje > Starostlivosť a čistenie sláčikových nástrojov > Leštidlo na sláčikové nástroje: Leštidlo Fingerboard; Leštidlo na nástroje; Lak
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til strengeinstrumenter > Pleie og rengjøring av strengeinstrumenter > Poleringsmidler for strengeinstrumenter: Poleringsmidler for fingerbrett; Poleringsmidler for instrumenter; Lakk
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 弦樂器配件 > 弦樂器清潔保養品 > 弦樂器擦拭用品: 手指滑板擦拭用品; 樂器擦拭用品; 亮光漆
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для струнных инструментов > Чистка струнных инструментов и уход за ними > Средства для полировки струнных инструментов: Полироль для накладок на гриф; Полироль для корпуса; Лак
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ εγχόρδων οργάνων > Φροντίδα & Καθαρισμός εγχόρδων οργάνων > Γυάλισμα εγχόρδων οργάνων: Γυαλιστικό ταστιέρας; Γυαλιστικό μουσικού οργάνου; Βερνίκι